Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW to read as follows:It is the intent of the legislature to increase access to medical treatment in workers' compensation including, but not limited to, making individualized determinations as to whether treatment for workplace injuries and occupational diseases is proper and necessary.Sec. 2. RCW 51.08.200 and 2023 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:"Attending provider" means a person who is ((a)): (1) A member of the health care provider network established under RCW 51.36.010((, is))or a person who is not a member of the health care provider network for claims where they are treating a worker under the conditions in RCW 51.36.010(2)(g)(i) (A) or (B); (2) treating injured workers within the person's scope of practice((,)); and ((is))(3) licensed under Title 18 RCW in one of the following professions: Physicians, chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathy, chapter 18.57 RCW; chiropractic, chapter 18.25 RCW; naturopathy, chapter 18.36A RCW; podiatric medicine and surgery, chapter 18.22 RCW; dentistry, chapter 18.32 RCW; optometry, chapter 18.53 RCW; in the case of claims solely for mental health conditions, psychology, chapter 18.83 RCW; physician assistants, chapter 18.71A RCW; and licensed advanced registered nurse practitioners, chapter 18.79 RCW.Sec. 3. RCW 51.36.010 and 2023 c 171 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislature finds that high quality medical treatment and adherence to occupational health best practices can prevent disability and reduce loss of family income for workers, and lower labor and insurance costs for employers. Injured workers deserve high quality medical care in accordance with current health care best practices. To this end, the department shall establish minimum standards for providers who treat workers from both state fund and self-insured employers. The department shall establish a health care provider network to treat injured workers, and shall accept providers into the network who meet those minimum standards. The department shall convene an advisory group made up of representatives from or designees of the workers' compensation advisory committee and the industrial insurance medical and chiropractic advisory committees to consider and advise the department related to implementation of this section, including development of best practices treatment guidelines for providers in the network. The department shall also seek the input of various health care provider groups and associations concerning the network's implementation.(b) Network providers must ((be required to)), when medically appropriate, follow the department's evidence-based coverage decisions and treatment guidelines, policies, and must ((be expected to)), when medically appropriate, follow other national treatment guidelines appropriate for their patient. The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall also establish additional best practice standards for providers to qualify for a second tier within the network, based on demonstrated use of occupational health best practices. This second tier is separate from and in addition to the centers for occupational health and education established under subsection (5) of this section.(2)(a) Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, of his or her own choice, if conveniently located, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, and proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her disability from such injury.(b) Once the provider network is established in the worker's geographic area, an injured worker may receive care from a nonnetwork provider only for an initial office or emergency room visit. However, the department or self-insurer may limit reimbursement to the department's standard fee for the services. The provider must comply with all applicable billing policies and must accept the department's fee schedule as payment in full.(c) The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall adopt policies for the development, credentialing, accreditation, and continued oversight of a network of health care providers approved to treat injured workers. Health care providers shall apply to the network by completing the department's provider application which shall have the force of a contract with the department to treat injured workers. The advisory group shall recommend minimum network standards for the department to approve a provider's application, to remove a provider from the network, or to require peer review such as, but not limited to:(i) Current malpractice insurance coverage exceeding a dollar amount threshold, number, or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(ii) Previous malpractice judgments or settlements that do not exceed a dollar amount threshold recommended by the advisory group, or a specific number or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(iii) No licensing or disciplinary action in any jurisdiction or loss of treating or admitting privileges by any board, commission, agency, public or private health care payer, or hospital;(iv) For some specialties such as surgeons, privileges in at least one hospital;(v) Whether the provider has been credentialed by another health plan that follows national quality assurance guidelines; and(vi) Alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan.The department shall develop alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan or as needed to address access to care concerns in certain regions.(d) Network provider contracts will automatically renew at the end of the contract period unless the department provides written notice of changes in contract provisions or the department or provider provides written notice of contract termination. The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall develop criteria for removal of a provider from the network to be presented to the department and advisory group for consideration in the development of contract terms.(e) In order to monitor quality of care and assure efficient management of the provider network, the department shall establish additional criteria and terms for network participation including, but not limited to, requiring compliance with administrative and billing policies.(f) The advisory group shall recommend best practices standards to the department to use in determining second tier network providers. The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for network providers who qualify for the second tier. The department is authorized to certify and decertify second tier providers.(3) The department shall work with self-insurers and the department utilization review provider to implement utilization review for the self-insured community to ensure consistent quality, cost-effective care for all injured workers and employers, and to reduce administrative burden for providers.(4) The department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be limited in point of duration as follows:In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances currently scheduled by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for an occupational disease.(5)(a) The legislature finds that the department and its business and labor partners have collaborated in establishing centers for occupational health and education to promote best practices and prevent preventable disability by focusing additional provider-based resources during the first twelve weeks following an injury. The centers for occupational health and education represent innovative accountable care systems in an early stage of development consistent with national health care reform efforts. Many Washington workers do not yet have access to these innovative health care delivery models.(b) To expand evidence-based occupational health best practices, the department shall establish additional centers for occupational health and education, with the goal of extending access to at least fifty percent of injured and ill workers by December 2013 and to all injured workers by December 2015. The department shall also develop additional best practices and incentives that span the entire period of recovery, not only the first twelve weeks.(c) The department shall certify and decertify centers for occupational health and education based on criteria including institutional leadership and geographic areas covered by the center for occupational health and education, occupational health leadership and education, mix of participating health care providers necessary to address the anticipated needs of injured workers, health services coordination to deliver occupational health best practices, indicators to measure the success of the center for occupational health and education, and agreement that the center's providers shall, if feasible, treat certain injured workers if referred by the department or a self-insurer.(d) Health care delivery organizations may apply to the department for certification as a center for occupational health and education. These may include, but are not limited to, hospitals and affiliated clinics and providers, multispecialty clinics, health maintenance organizations, and organized systems of network physicians.(e) The centers for occupational health and education shall implement benchmark quality indicators of occupational health best practices for individual providers, developed in collaboration with the department. A center for occupational health and education shall remove individual providers who do not consistently meet these quality benchmarks.(f) The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for center for occupational health and education providers that are based on progressive and measurable gains in occupational health best practices, and that are applicable throughout the duration of an injured or ill worker's episode of care.(g) The department shall develop electronic methods of tracking evidence-based quality measures to identify and improve outcomes for injured workers at risk of developing prolonged disability. In addition, these methods must be used to provide systematic feedback to physicians regarding quality of care, to conduct appropriate objective evaluation of progress in the centers for occupational health and education, and to allow efficient coordination of services.(6) If a provider fails to meet the minimum network standards established in subsection (2) of this section, the department is authorized to remove the provider from the network or take other appropriate action regarding a provider's participation. The department may also require remedial steps as a condition for a provider to participate in the network. The department, with input from the advisory group, shall establish waiting periods that may be imposed before a provider who has been denied or removed from the network may reapply.(7) The department may permanently remove a provider from the network or take other appropriate action when the provider exhibits a pattern of conduct of low quality care that exposes patients to risk of physical or psychiatric harm or death. Patterns that qualify as risk of harm include, but are not limited to, poor health care outcomes evidenced by increased, chronic, or prolonged pain or decreased function due to treatments that have not been shown to be curative, safe, or effective or for which it has been shown that the risks of harm exceed the benefits that can be reasonably expected based on peer-reviewed opinion.(8) The department may not remove a health care provider from the network for an isolated instance of poor health and recovery outcomes due to treatment by the provider.(9) When the department terminates a provider from the network, the department or self-insurer shall assist an injured worker currently under the provider's care in identifying a new network provider or providers from whom the worker can select an attending or treating provider. In such a case, the department or self-insurer shall notify the injured worker that he or she must choose a new attending or treating provider.(10) The department may adopt rules related to this section.(11) The department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory committee and to the appropriate committees of the legislature on each December 1st, beginning in 2012 and ending in 2016, on the implementation of the provider network and expansion of the centers for occupational health and education. The reports must include a summary of actions taken, progress toward long-term goals, outcomes of key initiatives, access to care issues, results of disputes or controversies related to new provisions, and whether any changes are needed to further improve the occupational health best practices care of injured workers.Sec. 4. RCW 51.36.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5117 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislature finds that high quality medical treatment and adherence to occupational health best practices can prevent disability and reduce loss of family income for workers, and lower labor and insurance costs for employers. Injured workers deserve high quality medical care in accordance with current health care best practices. To this end, the department shall establish minimum standards for providers who treat workers from both state fund and self-insured employers. The department shall establish a health care provider network to treat injured workers, and shall accept providers into the network who meet those minimum standards. The department shall convene an advisory group made up of representatives from or designees of the workers' compensation advisory committee and the industrial insurance medical and chiropractic advisory committees to consider and advise the department related to implementation of this section, including development of best practices treatment guidelines for providers in the network. The department shall also seek the input of various health care provider groups and associations concerning the network's implementation.(b) Network providers must ((be required to)), when medically appropriate, follow the department's evidence-based coverage decisions and treatment guidelines, policies, and must ((be expected to)), when medically appropriate, follow other national treatment guidelines appropriate for their patient. The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall also establish additional best practice standards for providers to qualify for a second tier within the network, based on demonstrated use of occupational health best practices. This second tier is separate from and in addition to the centers for occupational health and education established under subsection (5) of this section.(2)(a) Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, of his or her own choice, if conveniently located, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, and proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her disability from such injury.(b) Once the provider network is established in the worker's geographic area, an injured worker may receive care from a nonnetwork provider only for an initial office or emergency room visit. However, the department or self-insurer may limit reimbursement to the department's standard fee for the services. The provider must comply with all applicable billing policies and must accept the department's fee schedule as payment in full.(c) The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall adopt policies for the development, credentialing, accreditation, and continued oversight of a network of health care providers approved to treat injured workers. Health care providers shall apply to the network by completing the department's provider application which shall have the force of a contract with the department to treat injured workers. The advisory group shall recommend minimum network standards for the department to approve a provider's application, to remove a provider from the network, or to require peer review such as, but not limited to:(i) Current malpractice insurance coverage exceeding a dollar amount threshold, number, or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(ii) Previous malpractice judgments or settlements that do not exceed a dollar amount threshold recommended by the advisory group, or a specific number or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(iii) No licensing or disciplinary action in any jurisdiction or loss of treating or admitting privileges by any board, commission, agency, public or private health care payer, or hospital;(iv) For some specialties such as surgeons, privileges in at least one hospital;(v) Whether the provider has been credentialed by another health plan that follows national quality assurance guidelines; and(vi) Alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan.The department shall develop alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan or as needed to address access to care concerns in certain regions.(d) Network provider contracts will automatically renew at the end of the contract period unless the department provides written notice of changes in contract provisions or the department or provider provides written notice of contract termination. The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall develop criteria for removal of a provider from the network to be presented to the department and advisory group for consideration in the development of contract terms.(e) In order to monitor quality of care and assure efficient management of the provider network, the department shall establish additional criteria and terms for network participation including, but not limited to, requiring compliance with administrative and billing policies.(f) The advisory group shall recommend best practices standards to the department to use in determining second tier network providers. The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for network providers who qualify for the second tier. The department is authorized to certify and decertify second tier providers.(3) The department shall work with self-insurers and the department utilization review provider to implement utilization review for the self-insured community to ensure consistent quality, cost-effective care for all injured workers and employers, and to reduce administrative burden for providers.(4) The department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be limited in point of duration as follows:In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances currently scheduled by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for an occupational disease.(5)(a) The legislature finds that the department and its business and labor partners have collaborated in establishing centers for occupational health and education to promote best practices and prevent preventable disability by focusing additional provider-based resources during the first twelve weeks following an injury. The centers for occupational health and education represent innovative accountable care systems in an early stage of development consistent with national health care reform efforts. Many Washington workers do not yet have access to these innovative health care delivery models.(b) To expand evidence-based occupational health best practices, the department shall establish additional centers for occupational health and education, with the goal of extending access to at least fifty percent of injured and ill workers by December 2013 and to all injured workers by December 2015. The department shall also develop additional best practices and incentives that span the entire period of recovery, not only the first twelve weeks.(c) The department shall certify and decertify centers for occupational health and education based on criteria including institutional leadership and geographic areas covered by the center for occupational health and education, occupational health leadership and education, mix of participating health care providers necessary to address the anticipated needs of injured workers, health services coordination to deliver occupational health best practices, indicators to measure the success of the center for occupational health and education, and agreement that the center's providers shall, if feasible, treat certain injured workers if referred by the department or a self-insurer.(d) Health care delivery organizations may apply to the department for certification as a center for occupational health and education. These may include, but are not limited to, hospitals and affiliated clinics and providers, multispecialty clinics, health maintenance organizations, and organized systems of network physicians.(e) The centers for occupational health and education shall implement benchmark quality indicators of occupational health best practices for individual providers, developed in collaboration with the department. A center for occupational health and education shall remove individual providers who do not consistently meet these quality benchmarks.(f) The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for center for occupational health and education providers that are based on progressive and measurable gains in occupational health best practices, and that are applicable throughout the duration of an injured or ill worker's episode of care.(g) The department shall develop electronic methods of tracking evidence-based quality measures to identify and improve outcomes for injured workers at risk of developing prolonged disability. In addition, these methods must be used to provide systematic feedback to physicians regarding quality of care, to conduct appropriate objective evaluation of progress in the centers for occupational health and education, and to allow efficient coordination of services.(6) If a provider fails to meet the minimum network standards established in subsection (2) of this section, the department is authorized to remove the provider from the network or take other appropriate action regarding a provider's participation. The department may also require remedial steps as a condition for a provider to participate in the network. The department, with input from the advisory group, shall establish waiting periods that may be imposed before a provider who has been denied or removed from the network may reapply.(7) The department may permanently remove a provider from the network or take other appropriate action when the provider exhibits a pattern of conduct of low quality care that exposes patients to risk of physical or psychiatric harm or death. Patterns that qualify as risk of harm include, but are not limited to, poor health care outcomes evidenced by increased, chronic, or prolonged pain or decreased function due to treatments that have not been shown to be curative, safe, or effective or for which it has been shown that the risks of harm exceed the benefits that can be reasonably expected based on peer-reviewed opinion.(8) The department may not remove a health care provider from the network for an isolated instance of poor health and recovery outcomes due to treatment by the provider.(9) When the department terminates a provider from the network, the department or self-insurer shall assist an injured worker currently under the provider's care in identifying a new network provider or providers from whom the worker can select an attending or treating provider. In such a case, the department or self-insurer shall notify the injured worker that he or she must choose a new attending or treating provider.(10) The department may adopt rules related to this section.(11) The department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory committee and to the appropriate committees of the legislature on each December 1st, beginning in 2012 and ending in 2016, on the implementation of the provider network and expansion of the centers for occupational health and education. The reports must include a summary of actions taken, progress toward long-term goals, outcomes of key initiatives, access to care issues, results of disputes or controversies related to new provisions, and whether any changes are needed to further improve the occupational health best practices care of injured workers.Sec. 5. RCW 51.36.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5117 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislature finds that high quality medical treatment and adherence to occupational health best practices can prevent disability and reduce loss of family income for workers, and lower labor and insurance costs for employers. Injured workers deserve high quality medical care in accordance with current health care best practices. To this end, the department shall establish minimum standards for providers who treat workers from both state fund and self-insured employers. The department shall establish a health care provider network to treat injured workers, and shall accept providers into the network who meet those minimum standards. The department shall convene an advisory group made up of representatives from or designees of the workers' compensation advisory committee and the industrial insurance medical and chiropractic advisory committees to consider and advise the department related to implementation of this section, including development of best practices treatment guidelines for providers in the network. The department shall also seek the input of various health care provider groups and associations concerning the network's implementation.(b) Network providers must ((be required to)), when medically appropriate, follow the department's evidence-based coverage decisions and treatment guidelines, policies, and must ((be expected to)), when medically appropriate, follow other national treatment guidelines appropriate for their patient. The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall also establish additional best practice standards for providers to qualify for a second tier within the network, based on demonstrated use of occupational health best practices. This second tier is separate from and in addition to the centers for occupational health and education established under subsection (5) of this section.(2)(a)(i) Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this title, ((he or she))the worker shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, of ((his or her))the worker's own choice, if conveniently located, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, and proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of ((his or her))the worker's disability from such injury.(ii)(A) Upon notice of an injury, an employer must inform the injured worker that the worker has a right to seek initial treatment or emergency medical treatment with a provider of the worker's own choice and that the worker has a right to seek further treatment with a provider of the worker's own choice from within the medical provider network. An employer is prohibited from requiring or coercing an injured worker to seek medical treatment from a specific provider or clinic. Nothing in this subsection (2) prevents an employer from providing on-site medical care to a worker at the worker's own choice. The department shall investigate any allegation that an employer attempted to require or coerce an injured worker to seek treatment from a specific provider or clinic. A violation of this subsection (2) by a self-insured employer is a violation of RCW 51.48.017 and may constitute a violation of RCW 51.14.180 as determined by the department based on the nature, severity, and frequency of the conduct. A violation of this subsection (2) by an employer insured through the state may subject the employer to a penalty of at least $250, not to exceed $2,500, for each violation, payable to the supplemental pension fund. The department shall determine the amount of the penalty for the state fund employer's violation of this subsection based on the nature, severity, and frequency of the conduct. Additionally, when the department finds a pattern of conduct in violation of this subsection by an employer insured through the state fund, the department may prohibit the employer from current or future participation in a retrospective rating program.(B) For purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(ii), "coercion" includes threats, retaliation, or improper pressure.(b) ((Once))Except as provided in (g) of this subsection, once the provider network is established in the worker's geographic area, an injured worker may receive care from a nonnetwork provider only for an initial office or emergency room visit. However, the department or self-insurer may limit reimbursement to the department's standard fee for the services. The provider must comply with all applicable billing policies and must accept the department's fee schedule as payment in full.(c) The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall adopt policies for the development, credentialing, accreditation, and continued oversight of a network of health care providers approved to treat injured workers. Health care providers shall apply to the network by completing the department's provider application which shall have the force of a contract with the department to treat injured workers. The advisory group shall recommend minimum network standards for the department to approve a provider's application, to remove a provider from the network, or to require peer review such as, but not limited to:(i) Current malpractice insurance coverage exceeding a dollar amount threshold, number, or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(ii) Previous malpractice judgments or settlements that do not exceed a dollar amount threshold recommended by the advisory group, or a specific number or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(iii) No licensing or disciplinary action in any jurisdiction or loss of treating or admitting privileges by any board, commission, agency, public or private health care payer, or hospital;(iv) For some specialties such as surgeons, privileges in at least one hospital;(v) Whether the provider has been credentialed by another health plan that follows national quality assurance guidelines; and(vi) Alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan.The department shall develop alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan or as needed to address access to care concerns in certain regions.(d) Network provider contracts will automatically renew at the end of the contract period unless the department provides written notice of changes in contract provisions or the department or provider provides written notice of contract termination. The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall develop criteria for removal of a provider from the network to be presented to the department and advisory group for consideration in the development of contract terms.(e) In order to monitor quality of care and assure efficient management of the provider network, the department shall establish additional criteria and terms for network participation including, but not limited to, requiring compliance with administrative and billing policies.(f) The advisory group shall recommend best practices standards to the department to use in determining second tier network providers. The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for network providers who qualify for the second tier. The department is authorized to certify and decertify second tier providers.(g)(i) If a worker is unable to find a provider in the medical provider network who is willing to treat the worker, or serve as the attending provider, within 25 miles of the worker's home, the worker may provide notice of this fact to the department or self-insured employer. Within 10 calendar days of receiving such notice, the department or self-insured employer shall send the worker a declaration developed by the department to sign certifying this fact. Upon receipt of the signed declaration, the department or self-insured employer will have 10 calendar days to assist the worker in finding a provider in the medical provider network or who agrees to join the medical provider network to treat the worker. If no provider is found, the worker may seek treatment from a nonnetwork provider, or select an attending provider who is not in the medical provider network, within 25 miles of the worker's home, if the provider agrees to be paid in accordance with the department's medical aid rules and fee schedules and sign a nonnetwork provider agreement. The department or self-insured employer shall pay for such treatment in accordance with the department's medical aid rules and fee schedules.(ii) If the worker has met the conditions of (g)(i) of this subsection (2), the worker may immediately receive treatment from a nonnetwork provider, regardless of whether the provider has completed a nonnetwork provider agreement or application to the medical provider network. Provision of treatment to the worker serves as the provider's agreement to follow the department's medical aid rules and fee schedules.(3)(a) The department shall work with self-insurers and the department utilization review provider to implement utilization review for the self-insured community to ensure consistent quality, cost-effective care for all injured workers and employers, and to reduce administrative burden for providers.(b) Any utilization review must be completed, and recommendations sent to the department, within 10 business days of the date the utilization review provider receives all requested information necessary to make the treatment recommendation or the treatment must be authorized. If there is a question as to whether the treatment authorized pursuant to this subsection (3) is for a condition related to the worker's injury or occupational disease, the department shall adjudicate whether that condition is related by issuing an order in compliance with RCW 51.52.050 within 30 days of the deadline for completion of the utilization review.(4)(a) The department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for benefits is allowed. (b) In all accepted claims, treatment shall be limited in point of duration as follows:(i) In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation shall be awarded ((him or her))the worker, except when the worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to ((him or her))the worker shall cease((; in)).(ii) In the case of temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to ((him or her))the worker shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to ((his or her))the worker's work ((his or her)), the worker's medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to ((his or her))the worker's more complete recovery((; in)).(iii) In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum payment or initial payment of the permanent partial disability award is made with the worker: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, If the department denies an application under RCW 51.32.160(1), on the same order denying the application, the department may authorize continued medical and surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such medical and surgical treatment is necessary to protect such worker's life or provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances currently scheduled by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued treatment, the department must receive a request for approval of the treatment within 120 days of the worker's receipt of the treatment, and the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance is necessary.(iv) In the case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with ((him or her or he or she))the worker, or the worker is placed upon the permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely in ((his or her))the supervisor's discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance ((to protect such worker's life or provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances currently scheduled by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary)). In order to authorize such continued treatment, the department must receive a request for approval of the treatment within 120 days of the worker's receipt of the treatment, and the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance is necessary.(v) Where cancer is an accepted diagnosis, the department or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall continue to pay for monitoring of the diagnosis at a frequency recommended by the worker's treating oncologist. The monitoring must include all necessary diagnostic studies and associated medical consultations.(c) The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer, in ((his or her))their sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for an occupational disease.(d) Nothing in this section prevents a worker from reopening the worker's claim pursuant to RCW 51.32.160.(5)(a) The legislature finds that the department and its business and labor partners have collaborated in establishing centers for occupational health and education to promote best practices and prevent preventable disability by focusing additional provider-based resources during the first twelve weeks following an injury. The centers for occupational health and education represent innovative accountable care systems in an early stage of development consistent with national health care reform efforts. Many Washington workers do not yet have access to these innovative health care delivery models.(b) ((To expand evidence-based occupational health best practices, the department shall establish additional centers for occupational health and education, with the goal of extending access to at least fifty percent of injured and ill workers by December 2013 and to all injured workers by December 2015.)) The department shall ((also)) develop additional best practices and incentives that span the entire period of recovery, not only the first twelve weeks.(c) The department shall certify and decertify centers for occupational health and education based on criteria including institutional leadership and geographic areas covered by the center for occupational health and education, occupational health leadership and education, mix of participating health care providers necessary to address the anticipated needs of injured workers, health services coordination to deliver occupational health best practices, indicators to measure the success of the center for occupational health and education, and agreement that the center's providers shall, if feasible, treat certain injured workers if referred by the department or a self-insurer.(d) Health care delivery organizations may apply to the department for certification as a center for occupational health and education. These may include, but are not limited to, hospitals and affiliated clinics and providers, multispecialty clinics, health maintenance organizations, and organized systems of network physicians.(e) The centers for occupational health and education shall implement benchmark quality indicators of occupational health best practices for individual providers, developed in collaboration with the department. A center for occupational health and education shall remove individual providers who do not consistently meet these quality benchmarks.(f) The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for center for occupational health and education providers that are based on progressive and measurable gains in occupational health best practices, and that are applicable throughout the duration of an injured or ill worker's episode of care.(g) The department shall develop electronic methods of tracking evidence-based quality measures to identify and improve outcomes for injured workers at risk of developing prolonged disability. In addition, these methods must be used to provide systematic feedback to physicians regarding quality of care, to conduct appropriate objective evaluation of progress in the centers for occupational health and education, and to allow efficient coordination of services.(6)(a) If a provider fails to meet the minimum network standards established in subsection (2) of this section, the department is authorized to remove the provider from the network or take other appropriate action regarding a provider's participation. The department may also require remedial steps as a condition for a provider to participate in the network. The department, with input from the advisory group, shall establish waiting periods that may be imposed before a provider who has been denied or removed from the network may reapply.(((7)))(b) The department may permanently remove a provider from the network or take other appropriate action when the provider exhibits a pattern of conduct of low quality care that exposes patients to risk of physical or psychiatric harm or death. Patterns that qualify as risk of harm include, but are not limited to, poor health care outcomes evidenced by increased, chronic, or prolonged pain or decreased function due to treatments that have not been shown to be curative, safe, or effective or for which it has been shown that the risks of harm exceed the benefits that can be reasonably expected based on peer-reviewed opinion.(((8)))(c) The department may not remove a health care provider from the network for an isolated instance of poor health and recovery outcomes due to treatment by the provider.(((9)))(d) When the department terminates a provider from the network, the department or self-insurer shall assist an injured worker currently under the provider's care in identifying a new network provider or providers from whom the worker can select an attending or treating provider. In such a case, the department or self-insurer shall notify the injured worker that ((he or she))the worker must choose a new attending or treating provider.(((10)))(e) Any action taken by the department to remove a provider or terminate a provider from the network must be done in writing. The provider may appeal such action to the board of industrial insurance appeals pursuant to chapter 51.52 RCW.(7) The department may adopt rules related to this section.(((11) The department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory committee and to the appropriate committees of the legislature on each December 1st, beginning in 2012 and ending in 2016, on the implementation of the provider network and expansion of the centers for occupational health and education. The reports must include a summary of actions taken, progress toward long-term goals, outcomes of key initiatives, access to care issues, results of disputes or controversies related to new provisions, and whether any changes are needed to further improve the occupational health best practices care of injured workers.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:(1) In order to improve the timely management of claims, the department is authorized to hire additional claims managers to the extent necessary to reach the recommended average claims caseload of 141 claims per claims manager, as identified in the June 2015 consultant's report for the joint legislative audit and review committee.(2) Beginning July 1, 2031, and not more than every five years thereafter, the department or a third party contracted by the department shall conduct a study to determine the national average caseload per claims manager. The department is authorized to hire additional claims managers to adjust the caseload to be consistent with the national average.(3) If the department hires additional claims managers under this section, the department must implement procedures to reduce the caseload of claims managers and implement more frequent reviews of cases by claims managers.(4)(a) Moneys used to hire and retain additional claims managers under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are subject to the allotment of all expenditures pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW. Expenditures include the salaries and expenses of additional claims managers. (b) Appropriations are not required for moneys used pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Allotted funds may be used only to hire and retain additional claims managers necessary to meet the caseloads described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.(5) Beginning December 1, 2026, the director shall provide quarterly reports to the workers' compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110 summarizing indicators of progress, as determined by the department, on the following since the effective date of this section:(a) Average claim costs;(b) The duration of temporary total disability benefits granted to claimants under RCW 51.32.090;(c) Claim management timeliness and operational efficiency within the workers' compensation system; and(d) Other measures related to the impact of the additional claims managers hired under this section.(6) By June 30, 2029, the director shall provide to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report summarizing the impact of additional claims managers hired under this section. The report shall summarize trends in average claim costs, the average duration of temporary total disability benefits granted to claimants under RCW 51.32.090, and standard measures of claim management timeliness and operational efficiency within the workers' compensation system since the effective date of this section.(7) By December 31, 2032, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall review and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on whether this section has improved:(a) The timeliness of claims handling by the department;(b) Access by injured or occupationally ill workers to timely medical treatment; and(c) Claims costs, including the effect on medical costs and the duration of temporary disability benefits.Sec. 7. RCW 43.88.180 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 100 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Appropriations shall not be required for refunds, as provided in RCW 43.88.170, nor in the case of payments other than for administrative expenses, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, or capital improvements to be made from trust funds specifically created by law to discharge awards, claims, annuities and other liabilities of the state. Said trust funds shall include, but shall not be limited to, the accident fund, medical aid fund, retirement system fund, Washington state patrol retirement fund and unemployment trust fund. Appropriations may be required in the case of public service enterprises defined for the purposes of this section as proprietary functions conducted by an agency of the state. An appropriation may be required to permit payment of obligations by revolving funds, as provided in RCW 43.88.190.(2) Appropriations are not required for moneys used pursuant to section 6 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. This act applies to all claims regardless of the date of injury or manifestation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. Section 4 of this act expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. Section 5 of this act applies to treatment decisions made on or after the effective date of that section.--- END ---